Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-236
Acknowledgment or certificate of genuineness; duty to record; failure; effect.

The certificate of the proof or acknowledgment of every deed, and the certificate of the genuineness of the signature of any officer, in the cases where such last-mentioned certificate is required, shall be recorded together with the deed so proved or acknowledged; and unless the certificates be so recorded, neither the record of such deed nor the transcript thereof shall be read or received in evidence.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 14, p. 283;

R.S.1913, § 6211;

C.S.1922, § 5610;

C.S.1929, § 76-216;

R.S.1943, § 76-236.

Statute of limitations, see section 25-202.

Acknowledgment showing appearance and acknowledgment by mortgagee but not of mortgagor was fatally defective. Troyer v. Mundy, 60 F.2d 818 (8th Cir. 1932).